Washington statutes.
RCW 19.154.090

Unfair and deceptive act—Unfair method of competition—Civil remedy.

(1) The legislature finds and declares that any violation of this chapter substantially affects the public interest and is an unfair and deceptive act or practice and unfair method of competition in the conduct of trade or commerce as set forth in RCW 19.86.020.

(2) In addition to all remedies available in chapter 19.86 RCW, a person injured by a violation of this chapter may bring a civil action to recover the actual damages proximately caused by a violation of this chapter, or one thousand dollars, whichever is greater.

[ 2011 c 244 s 5; 1989 c 117 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 244: See note following RCW 19.154.010.